New York, session 2025-2026, S7232.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 9-103 of the general obligations law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. an owner, lessee or occupant of a premises, which is operated as 4 a business entity or not-for-profit corporation, who provides assistance 5 to a victim of a crime by allowing such victim to remain upon such prem- 6 ises for the purpose of summoning a police officer and/or emergency 7 medical personnel, shall assume no responsibility for or incur liability 8 for any personal injury, death or property damage sustained by the crime 9 victim while upon such premises in the course of seeking assistance, 10 unless it is established that such injury or death was caused by gross 11 negligence on the part of such business entity or not-for-profit corpo- 12 ration. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01794-01-5